Utah statutes.
73-18c-201.    Division to administer and enforce chapter -- Board may adopt rules.

(1)  The division shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  The board may adopt rules as necessary for the administration of this chapter in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

